Washington statutes.
RCW 9.61.190

Carrier or racing pigeons—Injury to.

It is a class 1 civil infraction for any person, other than the owner thereof or his or her authorized agent, to knowingly shoot, kill, maim, injure, molest, entrap, or detain any Antwerp Messenger or Racing Pigeon, commonly called "carrier or racing pigeons", having the name of its owner stamped upon its wing or tail or bearing upon its leg a band or ring with the name or initials of the owner or an identification or registration number stamped thereon.

[ 2011 c 336 s 314; 1987 c 456 s 25; 1963 c 69 s 1.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—1987 c 456: See RCW 7.80.005.

Effective date—1987 c 456 ss 9-31: See RCW 7.80.901.